Missouri, session 2026, SB1260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 196.990, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
196.990 and 210.225, to read as follows:
196.990. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Administer", the direct application of an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to the body of
an individual;
(2) "Authorized entity", any entity or organization at
or in connection with which allergens capable of causing
anaphylaxis may be present including, but not limited to,
qualified first responders, as such term is defined in
section 321.621, restaurants, recreation camps, youth sports
leagues, child care facilities, amusement parks, and sports
arenas. "Authorized entity" shall not include any public
school or public charter school;
(3) "Epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device", a
single-use device used for the [automatic injection]
delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human
body;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1260 2
(4) "Physician", a physician licensed in this state
under chapter 334;
(5) "Provide", the supply of one or more epinephrine
[auto-injectors] delivery devices to an individual;
(6) "Self-administration", a person's discretionary
use of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device.
2. A physician may prescribe epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery devices in the name of an authorized
entity for use in accordance with this section, and
pharmacists, physicians, and other persons authorized to
dispense prescription medications may dispense epinephrine
[auto-injectors] delivery devices under a prescription
issued in the name of an authorized entity.
3. An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply
of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices under a
prescription issued in accordance with this section. Such
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices shall be
stored in a location readily accessible in an emergency and
in accordance with the epinephrine [auto-injector's]
delivery device's instructions for use and any additional
requirements established by the department of health and
senior services by rule. An authorized entity shall
designate employees or agents who have completed the
training required under this section to be responsible for
the storage, maintenance, and general oversight of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices acquired by
the authorized entity.
4. An authorized entity that acquires a supply of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices under a
prescription issued in accordance with this section shall
ensure that:

SB 1260 3
(1) Expected epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
device users receive training in recognizing symptoms of
severe allergic reactions including anaphylaxis and the use
of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices from a
nationally recognized organization experienced in training
laypersons in emergency health treatment or another entity
or person approved by the department of health and senior
services;
(2) All epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices
are maintained and stored according to the epinephrine [auto-
injector's] delivery device's instructions for use;
(3) Any person who provides or administers an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to an individual
who the person believes in good faith is experiencing
anaphylaxis activates the emergency medical services system
as soon as possible; and
(4) A proper review of all situations in which an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device is used to
render emergency care is conducted.
5. Any authorized entity that acquires a supply of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices under a
prescription issued in accordance with this section shall
notify the emergency communications district or the
ambulance dispatch center of the primary provider of
emergency medical services where the epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery devices are to be located within the
entity's facility.
6. No person shall provide or administer an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to any
individual who is under eighteen years of age without the
verbal consent of a parent or guardian who is present at the
time when provision or administration of the epinephrine

SB 1260 4
[auto-injector] delivery device is needed. Provided,
however, that a person may provide or administer an
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device to such an
individual without the consent of a parent or guardian if
the parent or guardian is not physically present and the
person reasonably believes the individual shall be in
imminent danger without the provision or administration of
the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device.
7. The following persons and entities shall not be
liable for any injuries or related damages that result from
the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine
[auto-injector] delivery device in accordance with this
section that may constitute ordinary negligence:
(1) An authorized entity that possesses and makes
available epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices and
its employees, agents, and other trained persons;
(2) Any person who uses an epinephrine [auto-injector]
delivery device made available under this section;
(3) A physician that prescribes epinephrine [auto-
100 injectors] delivery devices to an authorized entity; or
101 (4) Any person or entity that conducts the training
102 described in this section.
103 Such immunity does not apply to acts or omissions
104 constituting a reckless disregard for the safety of others
105 or willful or wanton conduct. The administration of an
106 epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device in accordance
107 with this section shall not be considered the practice of
108 medicine. The immunity from liability provided under this
109 subsection is in addition to and not in lieu of that
110 provided under section 537.037. An authorized entity
111 located in this state shall not be liable for any injuries

SB 1260 5
112 or related damages that result from the provision or
113 administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
114 device by its employees or agents outside of this state if
115 the entity or its employee or agent is not liable for such
116 injuries or related damages under the laws of the state in
117 which such provision or administration occurred. No trained
118 person who is in compliance with this section and who in
119 good faith and exercising reasonable care fails to
120 administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery device
121 shall be liable for such failure.
122 8. All basic life support ambulances and stretcher
123 vans operated in the state shall be equipped with
124 epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery devices and be staffed
125 by at least one individual trained in the use of epinephrine
126 [auto-injectors] delivery devices.
127 9. The provisions of this section shall apply in all
128 counties within the state and any city not within a county.
129 10. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
130 superseding the provisions of section 167.630.
210.225. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "Elijah's Law".
2. (1) Before July 1, 2028, each licensed child care
provider shall adopt a policy on allergy prevention and
response with priority given to addressing potentially
deadly food-borne allergies. Such policy shall contain, but
shall not be limited to, the following elements:
(a) Distinguishing between building-wide, room-level,
and individual approaches to allergy prevention and
management;
(b) Providing an age-appropriate response to building-
level and room-level allergy education and prevention;

SB 1260 6
(c) Describing the role of child care facility staff
in determining how to manage an allergy problem, whether
through a plan prepared for a child under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, for a child with an
allergy that has been determined to be a disability, an
individualized health plan for a child who has an allergy
that is not disabling, or another allergy management plan;
(d) Describing the role of other children and parents
in cooperating to prevent and mitigate allergies;
(e) Addressing confidentiality issues involved with
sharing medical information, including specifying when
parental permission is required to make medical information
available; and
(f) Coordinating with the department of elementary and
secondary education, local health authorities, and other
appropriate entities to ensure efficient promulgation of
accurate information and to ensure that existing child care
facility safety and environmental policies do not conflict.
(2) Such policies may contain information from or
links to child care facility allergy prevention information
furnished by the Food Allergy and Anaphylaxis Network or
equivalent organization with a medical advisory board that
has allergy specialists.
3. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall, in cooperation with any appropriate
professional association, develop a model policy or policies
before July 1, 2027.
✓